Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-233
Domestic stock company; change to mutual company; requirements.

If any domestic insurance company, operating upon a stock basis, hereafter desires to amend its articles of incorporation and change its methods of doing business to those of a mutual company, it shall, in addition to the requirements of section 44-231, comply with the provisions of sections 44-233 to 44-241.

Laws 1953, c. 152, § 1, p. 480.